basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX K1 Y 76
SFX K1   0           te         [eě]
SFX K1   0           ti         [eě]
SFX K1   0           tem        [eě]
SFX K1   e           ata        e
SFX K1   e           at         e
SFX K1   e           atům       e
SFX K1   e           atech      e
SFX K1   e           aty        e
SFX K1   ě           ata        [^dnt]ě
SFX K1   ě           at         [^dnt]ě
SFX K1   ě           atům       [^dnt]ě
SFX K1   ě           atech      [^dnt]ě
SFX K1   ě           aty        [^dnt]ě
SFX K1   ně          ňata       ně
SFX K1   ně          ňat        ně
SFX K1   ně          ňatům      ně
SFX K1   ně          ňatech     ně
SFX K1   ně          ňaty       ně
SFX K1   tě          ťata       tě
SFX K1   tě          ťat        tě
SFX K1   tě          ťatům      tě
SFX K1   tě          ťatech     tě
SFX K1   tě          ťaty       tě
SFX K1   dě          ďata       dě
SFX K1   dě          ďat        dě
SFX K1   dě          ďatům      dě
SFX K1   dě          ďatech     dě
SFX K1   dě          ďaty       dě
SFX K1   0           tu         a
SFX K1   0           tem        a
SFX K1   0           ta         a
SFX K1   0           t          a
SFX K1   0           tům        a
SFX K1   0           tech       a
SFX K1   0           ty         a
SFX K1   0           i          [^aeěíýďňťs]
SFX K1   0           í          [^aeěíýďňťs]
SFX K1   0           em         [^aeěíýďňťsmcpšv]
SFX K1   0           ech        [^aeěíýďňťsmcpšv]
SFX K1   0           mi         [^aeěíýďňťsmcv]
SFX K1   0           ích        [pšv]
SFX K1   0           ím         [pšv]
SFX K1   0           ích        oc
SFX K1   0           ím         oc
SFX K1   0           ech        moc
SFX K1   0           em         moc
SFX K1   0           ech        [^o]c
SFX K1   0           em         [^o]c
SFX K1   0           mi         ěc
SFX K1   0           emi        [^ě]c
SFX K1   ď           di         ď
SFX K1   ď           dí         ď
SFX K1   ď           dím        ď
SFX K1   ď           dích       ď
SFX K1   ď           děmi       [^eěu]ď
SFX K1   0           mi         [eěu]ď
SFX K1   ť           ti         ť
SFX K1   ť           tí         ť
SFX K1   ť           tím        ť
SFX K1   ť           tích       ť
SFX K1   ť           těmi       [^ě]ť
SFX K1   0           mi         ěť
SFX K1   0           ěmi        v
SFX K1   es          si         es
SFX K1   es          sí         es
SFX K1   es          sím        es
SFX K1   es          sích       es
SFX K1   es          semi       es
SFX K1   0           i          [^e]s
SFX K1   0           í          [^e]s
SFX K1   0           ím         [^e]s
SFX K1   0           ích        [^e]s
SFX K1   0           mi         [^e]s
SFX K1   ý           ost/K2     ý     sticky
SFX K1   í           ost/K2     í     sticky
SFX K1   cký         čnost/K2   ický  sticky

SFX K2 Y 5
SFX K2   0           i          t
SFX K2   0           í          t
SFX K2   0           ech        t
SFX K2   0           em         t
SFX K2   0           mi         t
