basic-cs.dic
adaptovaný/Y1K1R1N1
agilní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
akceschopný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
aktuální/Y1K1R1N1Y2
amorální/Y1K1R1N1Y2
animální/Y1K1R1N1Y2
artikulovaný/Y1K1R1N1
ateliérový/Y1K1R1Y2
autorizovaný/Y1K1R1N1
balonový/Y1K1R1N1
barvitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
beskydský/Y1K1R1N1
bezcenný/Y1K1R1
bezedný/Y1K1R1Y2
bezletový/Y1K1R1
bezohledný/Y1K1R1Y2
bezprecedentní/Y1K1R1Y2
bezradný/Y1K1R1Y2
bezvízový/Y1K1R1
bezzubý/Y1K1R1
binární/Y1K1R1N1
blahý/Y1K1R1N1
bluegrassový/Y1K1R1N1
bodrý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
bojovný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
bonitní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
broušený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
bujný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
bytný/Y1K1R1N1
bědný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
březí/Y1K1R1N1
celoroční/Y1K1R1N1
cenný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
certifikovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
charterový/Y1K1R1
chlorovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
chovný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
chtivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
chytlavý/Y1K1R1Y2
citový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
cizorodý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ctěný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
cílevědomý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
datovaný/Y1K1R1N1
deficitní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
delegovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
depresívní/Y1K1R1N1
detailní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
deštivý/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
direktivní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
diskutabilní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
divadelní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dlouhovlasý/Y1K1R1
dobrotivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dochovaný/Y1K1R1N1
dojemný/Y1K1R1Y2
doložený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
domýšlivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
doprovázený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dospělý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dotažený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dovedný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dočasný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
dražený/Y1K1R1N1
druhotný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
drásavý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
duhový/Y1K1R1N1
dvanáctičlenný/Y1K1R1
dvorní/Y1K1R1Y2
dvoulitrový/Y1K1R1
dvoučlenný/Y1K1R1
dějový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
děsivý/Y1K1R1Y2
důležitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
důtklivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
důvěřivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
elitní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
epochální/Y1K1R1N1Y2
evakuovaný/Y1K1R1N1
exhibiční/Y1K1R1N1
exponenciální/Y1K1R1N1
falšovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
favorizovaný/Y1K1R1N1
fingovaný/Y1K1R1N1
formovaný/Y1K1R1N1
frontální/Y1K1R1N1Y2
férový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
geomagnetický/Y1K1R1N1
groteskní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hanebný/Y1K1R1Y2
havěť/K1
hlasitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hloupý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hlášený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hodnocený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hollywoodský/Y1K1R1N1
horizontální/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hospitalizovaný/Y1K1R1N1
houževnatý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hradský/Y1K1R1N1
hrdinský/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hrůzný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hutní/Y1K1Y2
hájený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
hříšný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ilustrovaný/Y1K1R1N1
impulzívní/Y1K1R1N1
infarktový/Y1K1R1N1
iniciativní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
inscenovaný/Y1K1R1N1
instrumentální/Y1K1R1N1
interdisciplinární/Y1K1R1
iontový/Y1K1R1N1
jaderský/Y1K1R1N1
jasný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
jednobarevný/Y1K1R1Y2
jednooký/Y1K1R1
jednotlivý/Y1K1R1N1
jehně/K1
jihosrbský/Y1K1R1N1
jásavý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kamenitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kardinální/Y1K1R1Y2
každodenní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
klasifikovaný/Y1K1R1N1
klonovaný/Y1K1R1N1
knoflíkový/Y1K1R1
kolektivní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
komentovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kompetentní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
komponovaný/Y1K1R1N1
koncipovaný/Y1K1R1N1
konkrétní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
konstruktivní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kontrolovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
konzumní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
korunovaný/Y1K1R1N1
koupěschopný/Y1K1R1N1
košatý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
krajní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
krkolomný/Y1K1R1Y2
krvelačný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
krátkozraký/Y1K1R1
kultivovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
kurýrní/Y1K1R1N1
kvašený/Y1K1R1N1
káně/K1Z1
křečový/Y1K1R1
lavinový/Y1K1R1N1
lenivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
lhostejný/Y1K1R1O1Y2
likvidovaný/Y1K1R1N1
lomný/Y1K1R1N1
léčitelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
malinový/Y1K1R1N1
marginální/Y1K1R1N1Y2
masívní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
mezinárodněprávní/Y1K1R1
mimorozpočtový/Y1K1R1
mlsný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
mnohý/Y1K1R1N1
mohutný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
motivovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
mrštný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
myslivý/Y1K1R1N1
měrný/Y1K1R1N1
nadbytečný/Y1K1R1Y2
nadutý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
nahraný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
naleštěný/Y1K1R1N1
naměřený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
naražený/Y1K1R1N1
nastražený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
navrácený/Y1K1R1N1
nebetyčný/Y1K1R1
nemocný/Y1K1R1Y2
neposedný/Y1K1R1Y2
nevrlý/Y1K1R1Y2
noc/K1
novorenesanční/Y1K1R1
nuzný/Y1K1R1Y2
náladový/Y1K1R1N1
náruživý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
názorný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
obchodovatelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
obhospodařovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
oblačný/Y1K1R1O1N1
obojživelný/Y1K1R1N1
obrozenecký/Y1K1R1Y2
obvyklý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
obšírný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
odborný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
odeslaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
odlišený/Y1K1R1N1
odpovědný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
odstraněný/Y1K1R1N1
odváděný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ohniskový/Y1K1R1N1
okolní/Y1K1R1N1
omamný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
opakovatelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
opomíjený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
opsaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ornamentální/Y1K1R1N1
osmnáctičlenný/Y1K1R1
ostříhaný/Y1K1R1N1
otopný/Y1K1R1N1
ovladatelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ozvučený/Y1K1R1N1
ožralý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
panevropský/Y1K1R1Y2
past/K1
perleťový/Y1K1R1N1
pilný/Y1K1R1O1N1Y2
plačtivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
plodný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pobožný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
poddajný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
podlý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
podrobný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
podvyživený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pohostinný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pokažený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pokřtěný/Y1K1R1N1
pomatený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pootevřený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
porevoluční/Y1K1R1
poskvrněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
postupný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
potenciální/Y1K1R1N1
pouhý/Y1K1R1N1
povolaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pověšený/Y1K1R1N1
pozorovatelský/Y1K1R1N1
pošetilý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pravdivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pravý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
principiální/Y1K1R1Y2
prodejný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
programový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
prokázaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pronesený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
propustný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
prostoduchý/Y1K1R1N1
protilehlý/Y1K1R1
protřelý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
provázaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
pružný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
průjezdný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
punkový/Y1K1R1N1
pěst/K1
přecpaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
předpojatý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
předváděný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
překladový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
přeměněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
přesný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
převlečený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
přibližný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
přiložený/Y1K1R1N1
přislíbený/Y1K1R1N1
přičinlivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
přímořský/Y1K1R1N1Y2
přístupný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
příšerný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rafinovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
realizovaný/Y1K1R1N1
relativní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
restituční/Y1K1N1
robustní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozbahněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozený/Y1K1R1N1
rozhádaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozložený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozpolcený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozsekaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozumný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rozvětvený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
rychlíkový/Y1K1R1
růžový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
samozřejmý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
schválnost/K1
sedmimetrový/Y1K1R1
senilní/Y1K1R1Y2
setrvačný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
shrbený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
skelný/Y1K1R1N1
skrovný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
slastný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
slovesnost/K1
služebný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
smrtelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
směnitelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
snášenlivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
solventní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
souměřitelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
současný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
spisovný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
spojovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
sporý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
spuštěný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
srovnaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
starodávný/Y1K1R1Y2
stavitelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
stinný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
strmý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
stupidní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
stíhaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
střídmý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
svatý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
sváteční/Y1K1R1N1Y2
svědomitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
synchronní/Y1K1R1N1Y2
tajný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
tepaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
titěrný/Y1K1R1Y2
točitý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
trefný/Y1K1R1N1
trojče/K1
tuctový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
tvářný/Y1K1R1N1
těžkopádný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
tříčlenný/Y1K1R1
udržovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ukojený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
uložený/Y1K1R1N1
unifikovaný/Y1K1R1N1
upravovaný/Y1K1R1N1
určovaný/Y1K1R1N1
uspokojivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
utkvělý/Y1K1R1Y2
uvolněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
uznaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
užitečný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vděčný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
velkorysý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
veřejnoprávní/Y1K1R1N1
vkladový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vláčný/Y1K1R1Y2
vodorovný/Y1K1R1Y2
vrchní/Y1K1Y2
vtíravý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vychlazený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyhecovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyhrazený/Y1K1R1N1
vykonatelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyléčený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyobrazený/Y1K1R1N1
vyprahlý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyrytý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vystavovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vytažený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vytížený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyvratitelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyztužený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vyšetřovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vzedmutý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
vzpřímený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
válcovaný/Y1K1R1N1
výbušný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
výklopný/Y1K1R1N1
výrobní/Y1K1R1N1
výtěžnost/K1
věnovaný/Y1K1R1N1
vřelý/Y1K1R1Y2
xenofobní/Y1K1R1
zadaný/Y1K1R1N1
zahájený/Y1K1R1N1
zakouřený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zamilovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zanedbaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zaplněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zarputilý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zasněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zasílaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zavilý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zašifrovaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zbytečný/Y1K1R1Y2
zdaněný/Y1K1R1N1
zdrženlivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zednářský/Y1K1R1
zhudebněný/Y1K1R1N1
zkažený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zkušený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zlovolný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zmrzačený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
znehodnocený/Y1K1R1N1Y2
známý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zpevněný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zpívaný/Y1K1R1N1
zrezivělý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
ztrátový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zvladatelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
zvučný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
záchranářský/Y1K1R1N1
záměrný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
závazkový/Y1K1R1N1
zářný/Y1K1R1N1
úchvatný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
únikový/Y1K1R1N1Y2
úsporný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
úzký/Y1K1R1O1
časový/Y1K1R1N1
činorodý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
čáslav/K1P1V1XD
řešitelný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
šestičlenný/Y1K1R1
škodolibý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
štvaný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
žebříčkový/Y1K1R1Y2
životaschopný/Y1K1R1N1Y2
žádostivý/Y1K1R1N1Y2
